Nevada, session 83, AB150.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 199.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
199.300 1. A person shall not, directly or indirectly, address
any threat or intimidation to a public officer, public employee, juror,
referee, arbitrator, appraiser, assessor or any judicial personnel of
an Indian tribe or person authorized by law to hear or determine
any controversy or matter, with the intent to induce such a person
contrary to his or her duty to do, make, omit or delay any act,
decision or determination, if the threat or intimidation
communicates the intent, either immediately or in the future:
(a) To cause bodily injury to any person;
(b) To cause physical damage to the property of any person
other than the person addressing the threat or intimidation;
(c) To subject any person other than the person addressing the
threat or intimidation to physical confinement or restraint; or
(d) To do any other act which is not otherwise authorized by law
and is intended to harm substantially any person other than the
person addressing the threat or intimidation with respect to the
person’s health, safety, business, financial condition or personal
relationships.
2. The provisions of this section must not be construed as
prohibiting a person from making any statement in good faith of an
intention to report any misconduct or malfeasance by a public
officer or employee.
3. A person who violates subsection 1 is guilty of:
(a) If physical force or the immediate threat of physical force is
used in the course of the intimidation or in the making of the threat:
(1) For a first offense, a category C felony and shall be
punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(2) For a second or subsequent offense, a category B felony
and shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $10,000.
(b) If no physical force or immediate threat of physical force is
used in the course of the intimidation or in the making of the threat,
a gross misdemeanor.
4. As used in this section [, “public] :
(a) “Indian tribe” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25 U.S.C.
§ 3602(3).
(b) “Judicial personnel” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25
U.S.C. § 3602(4).
(c) “Public employee” means any person who performs public
duties for compensation paid by the State, a county, city, local
government or other political subdivision of the State or an agency
thereof, including, without limitation, a person who performs a
service for compensation pursuant to a contract with the State,
county, city, local government or other political subdivision of the
State or an agency thereof.
Sec. 2. NRS 200.471 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.471 1. As used in this section:
(a) “Assault” means:
(1) Unlawfully attempting to use physical force against
another person; or
(2) Intentionally placing another person in reasonable
apprehension of immediate bodily harm.
(b) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
(c) “Health care facility” means a facility licensed pursuant to
chapter 449 of NRS, an office of a person listed in NRS 629.031, a
clinic or any other location, other than a residence, where health
care is provided.
(d) “Indian tribe” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25 U.S.C.
§ 3602(3).
(e) “Judicial personnel” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25
U.S.C. § 3602(4).
(f) “Officer” means:
(1) A person who possesses some or all of the powers of a
peace officer;
(2) A person employed in a full-time salaried occupation of
fire fighting for the benefit or safety of the public;
(3) A member of a volunteer fire department;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(4) A jailer, guard or other correctional officer of a city or
county jail;
(5) A prosecuting attorney or public defender of an agency
or political subdivision of the United States or of this State;
(6) A justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of
Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace, municipal judge,
magistrate, court commissioner, master or referee, including a
person acting pro tempore in a capacity listed in this subparagraph;
(7) Any judicial personnel of an Indian tribe;
(8) A clerk of a court, court administrator or court
executive officer in this State;
(9) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State whose official duties require the employee to make home
visits;
[(8)] (10) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a law
enforcement agency whose official duties require the employee or
volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to law enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the law enforcement agency;
[(9)] (11) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a fire-
fighting agency whose official duties require the employee or
volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to fire fighting or fire
prevention; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the fire-fighting agency; or
[(10)] (12) A civilian employee or volunteer of this State or
a political subdivision of this State whose official duties require the
employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to code enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
[(e)] (g) “Provider of health care” means:
(1) A physician, a medical student, a perfusionist, an
anesthesiologist assistant or a physician assistant licensed pursuant
to chapter 630 of NRS, a practitioner of respiratory care, a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
homeopathic physician, an advanced practitioner of homeopathy, a
homeopathic assistant, an osteopathic physician, a physician
assistant or anesthesiologist assistant licensed pursuant to chapter
633 of NRS, a podiatric physician, a podiatry hygienist, a physical
therapist, a medical laboratory technician, an optometrist, a
chiropractic physician, a chiropractic assistant, a naprapath, a doctor
of Oriental medicine, a nurse, a student nurse, a certified nursing
assistant, a nursing assistant trainee, a medication aide - certified, a
person who provides health care services in the home for
compensation, a dentist, a dental student, a dental hygienist, a dental
hygienist student, an expanded function dental assistant, an
expanded function dental assistant student, a pharmacist, a
pharmacy student, an intern pharmacist, an attendant on an
ambulance or air ambulance, a psychologist, a social worker, a
marriage and family therapist, a marriage and family therapist
intern, a clinical professional counselor, a clinical professional
counselor intern, a behavior analyst, an assistant behavior analyst, a
registered behavior technician, a mental health technician, a licensed
dietitian, the holder of a license or a limited license issued under the
provisions of chapter 653 of NRS, a public safety officer at a health
care facility, an emergency medical technician, an advanced
emergency medical technician, a paramedic or a participant in a
program of training to provide emergency medical services; or
(2) An employee of or volunteer for a health care facility
who:
(I) Interacts with the public;
(II) Performs tasks related to providing health care; and
(III) Wears identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the person as an employee or volunteer of the health care
facility.
[(f)] (h) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed
person employed by a board of trustees of a school district pursuant
to NRS 391.100 or 391.281.
[(g)] (i) “Sporting event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
[(h)] (j) “Sports official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
[(i)] (k) “Taxicab” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 706.8816.
[(j)] (l) “Taxicab driver” means a person who operates a
taxicab.
[(k)] (m) “Transit operator” means a person who operates a bus
or other vehicle as part of a public mass transportation system.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
[(l)] (n) “Utility worker” means an employee of a public utility
as defined in NRS 704.020 whose official duties require the
employee to:
(1) Interact with the public;
(2) Perform tasks related to the operation of the public
utility; and
(3) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that identifies
the employee as working for the public utility.
2. A person convicted of an assault shall be punished:
(a) If paragraph (c) or (d) does not apply to the circumstances of
the crime and the assault is not made with the use of a deadly
weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a
misdemeanor.
(b) If the assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the
present ability to use a deadly weapon, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
(c) If paragraph (d) does not apply to the circumstances of the
crime and if the assault:
(1) Is committed upon:
(I) An officer, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a
transit operator or a utility worker who is performing his or her
duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, a provider of health care, a school employee,
a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a utility worker or a sports
official,
 for a gross misdemeanor, unless the assault is made with the use
of a deadly weapon or the present ability to use a deadly weapon,
then for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for
a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years, or by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by both
fine and imprisonment.
(d) If the assault:
(1) Is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who is in
lawful custody or confinement or a parolee upon:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(I) An officer, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a
transit operator or a utility worker who is performing his or her
duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The probationer, prisoner or parolee charged knew or
should have known that the victim was an officer, a provider of
health care, a school employee, a taxicab driver, a transit operator, a
utility worker or a sports official,
 for a category D felony as provided in NRS 193.130, unless the
assault is made with the use of a deadly weapon or the present
ability to use a deadly weapon, then for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 1 year and a maximum term of not more than 6 years, or by a
fine of not more than $5,000, or by both fine and imprisonment.
Sec. 3. NRS 200.481 is hereby amended to read as follows:
200.481 1. As used in this section:
(a) “Battery” means any willful and unlawful use of force or
violence upon the person of another.
(b) “Child” means a person less than 18 years of age.
(c) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 239B.020.
(d) “Indian tribe” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25 U.S.C.
§ 3602(3).
(e) “Judicial personnel” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25
U.S.C. § 3602(4).
(f) “Officer” means:
(1) A person who possesses some or all of the powers of a
peace officer;
(2) A person employed in a full-time salaried occupation of
fire fighting for the benefit or safety of the public;
(3) A member of a volunteer fire department;
(4) A jailer, guard, matron or other correctional officer of a
city or county jail or detention facility;
(5) A prosecuting attorney or public defender of an agency
or political subdivision of the United States or of this State;
(6) A justice of the Supreme Court, judge of the Court of
Appeals, district judge, justice of the peace, municipal judge,
magistrate, court commissioner, master or referee, including,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
without limitation, a person acting pro tempore in a capacity listed
in this subparagraph;
(7) Any judicial personnel of an Indian tribe;
(8) A clerk of a court, court administrator or court
executive officer in this State;
(9) An employee of this State or a political subdivision of
this State whose official duties require the employee to make home
visits;
[(8)] (10) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a law
enforcement agency whose official duties require the employee or
volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to law enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the law enforcement agency;
[(9)] (11) A civilian employee or a volunteer of a fire-
fighting agency whose official duties require the employee or
volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to fire fighting or fire
prevention; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
the fire-fighting agency; or
[(10)] (12) A civilian employee or volunteer of this State or
a political subdivision of this State whose official duties require the
employee or volunteer to:
(I) Interact with the public;
(II) Perform tasks related to code enforcement; and
(III) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that
identifies the employee or volunteer as working or volunteering for
this State or a political subdivision of this State.
[(e)] (g) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 200.471.
[(f)] (h) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed
person employed by a board of trustees of a school district pursuant
to NRS 391.100 or 391.281.
[(g)] (i) “Sporting event” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
[(h)] (j) “Sports official” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 41.630.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
[(i)] (k) “Strangulation” means intentionally applying sufficient
pressure to another person to make it difficult or impossible for the
person to breathe, including, without limitation, applying pressure to
the neck, throat or windpipe that may prevent or hinder breathing or
reduce the intake of air, or applying any pressure to the neck on
either side of the windpipe, but not the windpipe itself, to stop the
flow of blood to the brain via the carotid arteries.
[(j)] (l) “Taxicab” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 706.8816.
[(k)] (m) “Taxicab driver” means a person who operates a
taxicab.
[(l)] (n) “Transit operator” means a person who operates a bus
or other vehicle as part of a public mass transportation system.
[(m)] (o) “Utility worker” means an employee of a public utility
as defined in NRS 704.020 whose official duties require the
employee to:
(1) Interact with the public;
(2) Perform tasks related to the operation of the public
utility; and
(3) Wear identification, clothing or a uniform that identifies
the employee as working for the public utility.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 200.485, a person
convicted of a battery, other than a battery committed by an adult
upon a child which constitutes child abuse, shall be punished:
(a) If the battery is not committed with a deadly weapon, and no
substantial bodily harm to the victim results, except under
circumstances where a greater penalty is provided in this section or
NRS 197.090, for a misdemeanor.
(b) If the battery is not committed with a deadly weapon, and
either substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the battery is
committed by strangulation, for a category C felony as provided in
NRS 193.130.
(c) If:
(1) The battery is committed upon:
(I) An officer, school employee, taxicab driver, transit
operator or utility worker who was performing his or her duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event;
(2) The officer, provider of health care, school employee,
taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker or sports official
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
suffers substantial bodily harm or the battery is committed by
strangulation; and
(3) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, provider of health care, school employee,
taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker or sports official,
 for a category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, or by a fine of not more than $10,000, or by
both fine and imprisonment.
(d) If the battery:
(1) Is committed upon:
(I) An officer, school employee, taxicab driver, transit
operator or utility worker who is performing his or her duty;
(II) A provider of health care while the provider of health
care is performing his or her duty or is on the premises where he or
she performs that duty; or
(III) A sports official based on the performance of his or
her duties at a sporting event; and
(2) The person charged knew or should have known that the
victim was an officer, provider of health care, school employee,
taxicab driver, transit operator, utility worker or sports official,
 for a gross misdemeanor, except under circumstances where a
greater penalty is provided in this section.
(e) If the battery is committed with the use of a deadly weapon,
and:
(1) No substantial bodily harm to the victim results, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years, and may be further punished by a fine of not
more than $10,000.
(2) Substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the
battery is committed by strangulation, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 15 years, and
may be further punished by a fine of not more than $10,000.
(f) If the battery is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who
is in lawful custody or confinement or a parolee, without the use of
a deadly weapon, whether or not substantial bodily harm results and
whether or not the battery is committed by strangulation, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(g) If the battery is committed by a probationer, a prisoner who
is in lawful custody or confinement or a parolee, with the use of a
deadly weapon, and:
(1) No substantial bodily harm to the victim results, for a
category B felony by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 2 years and a maximum term of not
more than 10 years.
(2) Substantial bodily harm to the victim results or the
battery is committed by strangulation, for a category B felony by
imprisonment in the state prison for a minimum term of not less
than 2 years and a maximum term of not more than 15 years.
Sec. 4. NRS 247.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
247.540 1. The following persons may request that the
personal information described in subsection 1, 2 or 3 of NRS
247.520 that is contained in the records of a county recorder be kept
confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any judicial personnel of an Indian tribe.
(e) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
[(e)] (f) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged
with the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy
appointed by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the
elections division of the county or city.
[(f)] (g) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
[(g)] (h) Any prosecutor.
[(h)] (i) Any state or county public defender.
[(i)] (j) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney
General who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of
Nevada or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
[(j)] (k) Any person, including, without limitation, a social
worker, employed by this State or a political subdivision of this
State who as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
[(k)] (l) Any county manager in this State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
[(l)] (m) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this
State or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
[(m)] (n) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a
person described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (m), inclusive.
[(n)] (o) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (m), inclusive, who
was killed in the performance of his or her duties.
[(o)] (p) Any person for whom a fictitious address has been
issued pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive.
2. Any nonprofit entity in this State that maintains a
confidential location for the purpose of providing shelter to victims
of domestic violence may request that the personal information
described in subsection 4 of NRS 247.520 that is contained in the
records of a county recorder be kept confidential.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Indian tribe” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25 U.S.C.
§ 3602(3).
(e) “Judicial personnel” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25
U.S.C. § 3602(4).
(f) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
[(e)] (g) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
[(f)] (h) “Social worker” means any person licensed under
chapter 641B of NRS.
Sec. 5. NRS 250.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
250.140 1. The following persons may request that personal
information described in subsection 1, 2 or 3 of NRS 250.120 that is
contained in the records of a county assessor be kept confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any judicial personnel of an Indian tribe.
(e) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
[(e)] (f) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged
with the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy
appointed by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the
elections division of the county or city.
[(f)] (g) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
[(g)] (h) Any prosecutor.
[(h)] (i) Any state or county public defender.
[(i)] (j) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney
General who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of
Nevada or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
[(j)] (k) Any person, including, without limitation, a social
worker, employed by this State or a political subdivision of this
State who as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
[(k)] (l) Any county manager in this State.
[(l)] (m) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this
State or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
[(m)] (n) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a
person described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (m), inclusive.
[(n)] (o) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (m), inclusive, who
was killed in the performance of his or her duties.
[(o)] (p) Any person for whom a fictitious address has been
issued pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive.
2. Any nonprofit entity in this State that maintains a
confidential location for the purpose of providing shelter to victims
of domestic violence may request that the personal information
described in subsection 4 of NRS 250.120 that is contained in the
records of a county assessor be kept confidential.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Indian tribe” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25 U.S.C.
§ 3602(3).
(e) “Judicial personnel” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25
U.S.C. § 3602(4).
(f) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
[(e)] (g) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
[(f)] (h) “Social worker” means any person licensed under
chapter 641B of NRS.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
Sec. 6. NRS 293.908 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.908 1. The following persons may request that personal
information contained in the records of the Secretary of State or a
county or city clerk be kept confidential:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any judicial personnel of an Indian tribe.
(e) Any clerk of a court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
[(e)] (f) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged
with the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy
appointed by such county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the
elections division of the county or city.
[(f)] (g) Any peace officer or retired peace officer.
[(g)] (h) Any prosecutor.
[(h)] (i) Any state or county public defender.
[(i)] (j) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney
General who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of
Nevada or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
[(j)] (k) Any person, including, without limitation, a social
worker, employed by this State or a political subdivision of this
State who as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
[(k)] (l) Any county manager in this State.
[(l)] (m) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this
State or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possess specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
[(m)] (n) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a
person described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (m), inclusive.
[(n)] (o) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to [(l),] (m), inclusive, who
was killed in the performance of his or her duties.
2. As used in this section:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Indian tribe” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25 U.S.C.
§ 3602(3).
(e) “Judicial personnel” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25
U.S.C. § 3602(4).
(f) “Peace officer” means:
(1) Any person upon whom some or all of the powers of a
peace officer are conferred pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360,
inclusive; and
(2) Any person:
(I) Who resides in this State;
(II) Whose primary duties are to enforce the law; and
(III) Who is employed by a law enforcement agency of
the Federal Government, including, without limitation, a ranger for
the National Park Service and an agent employed by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation, Secret Service, United States Department
of Homeland Security or United States Department of the Treasury.
[(e)] (g) “Prosecutor” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 241A.030.
[(f)] (h) “Social worker” means any person licensed under
chapter 641B of NRS.
Sec. 7. NRS 481.091 is hereby amended to read as follows:
481.091 1. The following persons may request that the
Department display an alternate address on the person’s driver’s
license, commercial driver’s license or identification card:
(a) Any justice or judge in this State.
(b) Any senior justice or senior judge in this State.
(c) Any court-appointed master in this State.
(d) Any judicial personnel of an Indian tribe.
(e) Any clerk of the court, court administrator or court executive
officer in this State.
[(e)] (f) Any prosecutor who as part of his or her normal job
responsibilities prosecutes persons for:
(1) Crimes that are punishable as category A felonies; or
(2) Domestic violence.
[(f)] (g) Any state or county public defender who as part of his
or her normal job responsibilities defends persons for:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
(1) Crimes that are punishable as category A felonies; or
(2) Domestic violence.
[(g)] (h) Any person employed by the Office of the Attorney
General who prosecutes or defends actions on behalf of the State of
Nevada or any agency in the Executive Department of the State
Government.
[(h)] (i) Any person, including, without limitation, a social
worker, employed by this State or a political subdivision of this
State who as part of his or her normal job responsibilities:
(1) Interacts with the public; and
(2) Performs tasks related to child welfare services or child
protective services or tasks that expose the person to comparable
dangers.
[(i)] (j) Any county manager in this State.
[(j)] (k) Any inspector, officer or investigator employed by this
State or a political subdivision of this State designated by his or her
employer:
(1) Who possesses specialized training in code enforcement;
(2) Who, as part of his or her normal job responsibilities,
interacts with the public; and
(3) Whose primary duties are the performance of tasks
related to code enforcement.
[(k)] (l) Any county or city clerk or registrar of voters charged
with the powers and duties relating to elections and any deputy
appointed by the county or city clerk or registrar of voters in the
elections division of the county or city.
[(l)] (m) The spouse, domestic partner or minor child of a
person described in paragraphs (a) to [(k),] (l), inclusive.
[(m)] (n) The surviving spouse, domestic partner or minor child
of a person described in paragraphs (a) to [(k),] (l), inclusive, who
was killed in the performance of his or her duties.
[(n)] (o) Any person for whom a fictitious address has been
issued pursuant to NRS 217.462 to 217.471, inclusive.
2. A person who wishes to have an alternate address displayed
on his or her driver’s license, commercial driver’s license or
identification card pursuant to this section must submit to the
Department satisfactory proof:
(a) That he or she is a person described in subsection 1; and
(b) Of the person’s address of principal residence and mailing
address, if different from the address of principal residence.
3. A person who obtains a driver’s license, commercial driver’s
license or identification card that displays an alternate address
pursuant to this section may subsequently submit a request to the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
Department to have his or her address of principal residence
displayed on his or her driver’s license, commercial driver’s license
or identification card instead of the alternate address.
4. The Department may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Child protective services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.042.
(b) “Child welfare services” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 432B.044.
(c) “Code enforcement” means the enforcement of laws,
ordinances or codes regulating public nuisances or the public health,
safety and welfare.
(d) “Indian tribe” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25 U.S.C.
§ 3602(3).
(e) “Judicial personnel” has the meaning ascribed to it in 25
U.S.C. § 3602(4).
(f) “Social worker” means any person licensed under chapter
641B of NRS.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)